Louisiana, session 2026, HB348.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1265(F) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§§1265. Property, casualty, and liability insurance policies; cancellation and
nonrenewal provisions; nonrenewal for rate inadequacy; certain prohibitions
* * *
F. An admitted insurer shall not issue a notice of cancellation or notice of
nonrenewal through electronic means, unless the insured consents in writing to
receive such notices through electronic means prior to the insurer issuing the notice.
A notice of cancellation or notice of nonrenewal issued through electronic means
without the insured’s prior consent to receive such notices through electronic means
is considered ineffective.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1059 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 348